dict/builddict/names.dic
مرء/AAGAY0
جمادى/ABEBLBLA
حبارى/ADACABAAEDECEBEALBLA
دواء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAJALBLA
رؤيا/ADACABAAEDECEBEAMBMALBLA
رجاء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAFDFCFBFALBLAMBMA
رحى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAMBMA
رداء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAFDFCFBFAJALBLA
مشفى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAJA
صفوة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
مصقلة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
مصلى/ADACABAAEDECEBEA
عذراء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
مغزى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAJAMBMALBLA
فتى/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAEDECEBEAJAMBMA
مساء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAJALBLA
ملأ/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAJALBLA
ماء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAJALBLA
منحى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAJA
نسا/ADACABAAEDECEBEAFDFCFBFAMBMA
منفى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAJA
إجلاء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
إجهاز/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
إجهاش/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
احتذاء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
احتماء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
ارتماء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
إرساء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
إرضاء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
استعطاء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
استعلاء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
استقراء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
اعتناء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
إعلاء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
إعماء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
امتلاء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
انبثاث/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
انبثاق/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
إيطاء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
إيواء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
بكاء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
تفاقم/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
تفتل/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
دعوى/ADACABAAEDECEBEALBLA
رياضة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
رضاء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
سكنى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAHDHCHBHALBLA
علاء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
عناء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
غراء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
قذى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAJAMBMA
تقصيب/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
تقصير/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
ندى/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAJAMBMA
مضيء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAIDICIBIAJAGEIE
شائط/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJA
شائع/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJA
مسيء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAIDICIBIAJAGEIE
مؤدى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAJA
مستثنى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAIDICIBIAJA
مشتكى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAIDICIBIAJA
منتقى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAIDICIBIAJA
موحى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAJA
متوفى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAIDICIBIAJA
مقوى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAIDICIBIAJA
موشى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAJA
فياض/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
منان/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
قميء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAIDICIBIAJA
هريء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAIDICIBIAJA
بطيء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAIDICIBIAJA
نسياء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
عفراء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
بلقاء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
جرداء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
حولاء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
خضراء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
شهباء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
شيباء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
عقفاء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
عنقاء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
قمراء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
لثغاء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
هوجاء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
هيقاء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
جدعاء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
حنفاء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
وبراء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
سغبى/ADACABAAEDECEBEA
ندوى/ADACABAAEDECEBEA
نشوى/ADACABAAEDECEBEA
ولهى/ADACABAAEDECEBEA
وسطى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAHDHCHBHA
سميا/ADACABAAEDECEBEAHDHCHBHA
ظهرى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAHDHCHBHA
خيرى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAHDHCHBHA
فرهى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAHDHCHBHA
كيسى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAHDHCHBHA
لذى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAHDHCHBHA
مثلى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAHDHCHBHA
نديا/ADACABAAEDECEBEAHDHCHBHA
طولى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAHDHCHBHA
غليا/ADACABAAEDECEBEAHDHCHBHA
فصحى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAHDHCHBHA
حسن/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIF
حق/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJA
حجاء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHAJA
جلاء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHAJA
رغاء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHAJA
مشاراة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJA
تسهية/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJA
التهاء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHAJA
براء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHAJA
التظاء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHAJA
رخاء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHAJA
إهماء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHAJA
رثاء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHAJA
غارس/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
غارض/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
متخوف/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
باح/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
مدلى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAJA
مغرى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAIDICIBIAJA
مستبقى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAIDICIBIAJA
بذيء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAIDICIBIAJAGEIE
بطيء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAIDICIBIAJAGEIE
جريء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAIDICIBIAJAGEIE
دنيء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAIDICIBIAJAGEIE
مليء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAIDICIBIAJAGEIE
هنيء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAIDICIBIAJAGEIE
إغماء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAHDHCHBHAJA
فقماء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFA
قضماء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFA
كليشيه/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJA
مونديال/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHALBLAJA
سطعاء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFA
خناء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFA
استغشاء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHALBLAJA
استنباء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAHDHCHBHALBLAJA
